Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1615
Dissolution, suspension, or forfeiture of corporate franchise.

Upon petition by the Attorney General, the court may, in its discretion, order the dissolution, or suspension or forfeiture of franchise, of any corporation which violates section 59-1603 or 59-1604 or the terms of any injunction issued as provided in the Consumer Protection Act.

Laws 1974, LB 1028, § 22;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 31.